Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
ARTICLE 5
COMMENCEMENT OF CRIMINAL ACTION

Editor's note:

This article was repealed and reenacted in 1972. For historical information concerning the repeal and reenactment, see the editor's note before the article 1 heading.

Section

PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS

PART 2 INDICTMENTS AND INFORMATIONS

PART 3 PRELIMINARY HEARING

PART 4 STATUTE OF LIMITATIONS

PART 5 INCARCERATION